Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1093.03
Affidavit; temporary order; notice; hearing; summons; service.

If filed at the commencement of suit, such affidavit and request for delivery and such temporary order containing the notice of hearing shall be served by the sheriff or other officer with the summons. If filed after the commencement of suit but before answer, they shall be served separately from the summons, but as soon after their filing and issuance as practicable. The summons shall be served within three days, excluding nonjudicial days, after the date of issuance.

Laws 1973, LB 474, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB355, § 2.